District of Columbia statutes.
47-337

Capital Review and Debt Affordability Committee.

(a)

There is established a Capital Review and Debt Affordability Committee.

(b)

The Committee shall consist of the following 5 members:

(1)

One individual appointed by the Mayor; and

(2)

The following 4 ex officio members:

(A)

The City Administrator;

(B)

The Chief Financial Officer;

(C)

The Director of the Department of Public Works; and

(D)

The Chairman of the Council.

(c)

The Chief Financial Officer shall serve as the chairperson of the Committee.

(d)

The chairperson shall call meetings of the Committee as needed to perform its duties.

May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-126, § 3, 41 DCR 1814
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-337.